da: Propelblads opbukning: Kraftig cupping; Let cupping; Medium cupping; Ingen cupping; Anden
fi: Potkurin lavan kaarevuus: Vahva kuppaus; Kevyt kuppaus; Keskivahva kuppaus; Ei kuppausta; Muu
it: Coppa delle pale dell'elica: Concavità accentuata; Concavità leggera; Concavità media; Nessuna concavità; Altro
lt-LT: Propelerio mentės užlenkimas: Sunkus įlinkis; Lengvas įlinkis; Vidutinis įlinkis; Be įlinkio; Kita
ja: プロペラブレードカップ: ヘビーカップ; ライトカップ; ミディアムカップ; カップなし; その他
hu: Propellerlapát kanalasítása: Erős kanalasodás; Enyhe kanalasodás; Közepes kanalasodás; Nincs kanalasodás; Egyéb
es: Concavidad de las palas de la hélice: Copa pesada; Copa ligera; Copa media; Sin copa; Otro
pl: Cup łopaty śruby napędowej: Duże wygięcie; Małe wygięcie; Średnie wygięcie; Brak wygięcia; Inne
th: ถ้วยใบพัด: คัพมาก; คัพน้อย; คัพปานกลาง; ไม่มีคัพ; อื่นๆ
en: Propeller blade cup: Heavy cup; Light cup; Medium cup; No cup; Other
tr: Pervane kanadı kenar kıvrımı: Yüksek kavis; Düşük kavis; Orta kavis; Kavis yok; Diğer
nl: Propellerblad cup: Zware cup; Lichte cup; Medium cup; Geen cup; Anders
de: Wölbung des Propellerblatts: Starker Cup; Leichter Cup; Mittlerer Cup; Kein Cup; Sonstige
pt-PT: Curvatura da lâmina da hélice: Concavidade acentuada; Concavidade ligeira; Concavidade média; Sem concavidade; Outra
zh-CN: 螺旋桨桨毂杯: 重度杯型; 轻度杯型; 中度杯型; 无杯型; 其他
cs: Miska vrtulového listu: Velké prohnutí (heavy cup); Malé prohnutí (light cup); Střední prohnutí (medium cup); Bez prohnutí; Ostatní
sl-SI: Ukrivljenost roba rezila propelerja: Močna usmeritev (Heavy cup); Rahla usmeritev (Light cup); Srednja usmeritev (Medium cup); Brez usmeritve (No cup); Drugo
sv: Propellerbladets skålning: Kraftig cuppning; Lätt cuppning; Medium cuppning; Ingen cuppning; Övrigt
ro-RO: Cupa palei elicei: Cupă adâncă; Cupă ușoară; Cupă medie; Fără cupă; Altele
pt-BR: Hélice pá cup: Copo acentuado; Copo leve; Copo médio; Sem copo; Outro
vi: Cốc cánh quạt: Cup lõm sâu; Cup lõm cạn; Cup lõm vừa; Không lõm; Khác
fr: Courbure des pales d’hélice: Fort cuppage; Cup léger; Cup moyen; Sans cup; Autre
ru: Купирование лопастей винта: Сильный загиб; Легкий загиб; Средний загиб; Без загиба; Другое
sk-SK: Zakrivenie listu vrtule: Veľké zakrivenie (Heavy cup); Malý cup; Stredný cup; Bez cupu; Iné
nb: Kopp på propellerblad: Kraftig kopp; Lett kopp; Medium kopp; Ingen kopp; Annet
hr-HR: Šalica lopatice propelera: Velika zakrivljenost ruba; Mala zakrivljenost ruba; Srednja zakrivljenost ruba; Bez zakrivljenosti; Ostalo
ko: 프로펠러 블레이드 컵: 헤비 컵; 라이트 컵; 미디엄 컵; 노 컵; 기타
zh-TW: 螺旋槳葉片杯形: 大捲邊; 小捲邊; 中捲邊; 無捲邊; 其他
el: Καμπυλότητα πτερυγίου έλικας: Βαριά κυρτότητα (heavy cup); Ελαφριά κυρτότητα (light cup); Μεσαία κυρτότητα (medium cup); Χωρίς κυρτότητα; Άλλο
bg-BG: Чашка на перката: Силно огъване (heavy cup); Леко огъване (light cup); Средно огъване (medium cup); Без огъване (no cup); Друго